el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση > Συσκευές επανάληψης & πομποδέκτες: Επεκτάσεις Ethernet & PoE; Οπτικές ενότητες πομποδέκτη; Επεκτάσεις εμβέλειας Wi-Fi
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование > Повторители и приемопередатчики: Удлинители Ethernet и PoE; Модули оптоволоконных трансиверов; Расширители диапазона Wi-Fi
it: Elettronica > Rete > Ripetitori e ricetrasmettitori: Estensori Ethernet e PoE; Moduli transceiver in fibra ottica; Estensori di portata Wi-Fi
pl: Elektronika > Sieci > Regeneratory sygnału i transceivery: Przedłużacze Ethernet i PoE; Moduły transceivera światłowodowego; Przedłużacze zasięgu Wi-Fi
en: Electronics > Networking > Repeaters & Transceivers: Ethernet & PoE Extenders; Fiber Optic Transceiver Modules; Wi-Fi Range Extenders
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク > 中継器・トランシーバー: イーサネット・PoEエクステンダー; 光ファイバートランシーバーモジュール; Wi-Fi中継機
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés > Átjátszók és adó-vevők: Ethernet- és PoE-hosszabbítók; Optikai szál adóvevőmodulok; Wi-Fi-hatótávolság-bővítők
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus > Toistimet ja lähetin-vastaanottimet: Ethernet- ja PoE-jatkaja; Valokuitulähetinvastaanotinmoduuli; Wi-Fi-kantaman pidennin
lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai > Kartotuvai ir siųstuvai-imtuvai: Eterneto ir PoE prailgintuvai; Šviesolaidiniai siųstuvo-imtuvo moduliai; Wi‑Fi signalo stiprintuvai
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路 > 中繼器和收發器: 乙太網及 PoE 延長器; 光纖收發器模組; WiFi 範圍延長器
ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹 > 리피터/트랜스시버: 이더넷 및 PoE 익스텐더; 광섬유 트랜시버 모듈; Wi-Fi 범위 확장기
es: Electrónica > Redes > Repetidores y transceptores: Extensores Ethernet y PoE; Módulos transceptores de fibra óptica; Extensores de rango Wi-Fi
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване > Ретранслатори и приемно-предавателни радиостанции: Ethernet и PoE удължители; Оптични трансивър модули; Wi-Fi удължители на обхват
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk > Repeatrar och transceivrar: Ethernet- och PoE-förlängare; Fiberoptiska sändtagarmoduler; Wi‑Fi-räckviddsförlängare
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng > Bộ lặp và bộ thu phát: Bộ mở rộng Ethernet và PoE; Mô-đun bộ phát nhận sợi quang; Bộ mở rộng tín hiệu Wi-Fi
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken > Repeaters en transceivers: Ethernet- en poe-extenders; Glasvezel transceivermodules; Wifi bereikversterkers
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede > Repetidores e transmissores: Extensores Ethernet e PoE; Módulos transceptores de fibra óptica; Extensores de alcance WiFi
cs: Elektronika > Sítě > Opakovače a vysílače: Ethernetové a PoE prodlužovače; Optické vysílací moduly; Rozšiřovače Wi-Fi signálu
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk > Repeatere og transceivere: Ethernet- og PoE-forlengere; Fiberoptiske transceivermoduler; Wifi-rekkeviddeforlengere
de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik > Repeater & Sende/-Empfangsgeräte: Ethernet- und PoE-Extender; Glasfaser-Transceiver-Module; Wi-Fi-Reichweitenverstärker
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje > Repetitorji in oddajniki: Ethernet in PoE podaljševalci; Optični sprejemno-oddajni moduli; Podaljševalci dosega Wi‑Fi
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje > Repetitori i primopredajnici: Ethernet i PoE pojačivači; Moduli optičkog primopredajnika; Wi-Fi pojačivači dometa
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete > Opakovače a prijímače: Ethernet a PoE predlžovače; Optické transceiverové moduly; Wi‑Fi predlžovače dosahu
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele > Repetoare și aparate de emisie-recepție: Prelungitoare Ethernet și PoE; Module dispozitiv de emisie-recepție pentru fibră optică; Prelungitoare de semnal Wi-Fi
tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri > Repeaterlar ve Alıcı Vericiler: Ethernet ve PoE Genişleticiler; Fiber Optik Alıcı-Verici Modülleri; Wi-Fi Kapsama Genişleticiler
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络 > 中继器与收发器: 以太网和 PoE 延长器; 光纤收发器模块; Wi-Fi 信号扩展器
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede > Repetidores e transcetores: Extensores ethernet e PoE; Módulos transcetor de fibra ótica; Extensores de alcance Wi-Fi
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux > Répéteurs et émetteurs-récepteurs: Extendeurs Ethernet et PoE; Modules émetteurs-récepteurs à fibre optique; Extendeurs de portée Wi-Fi
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย > เครื่องทวนสัญญาณและเครื่องรับส่ง: ตัวขยายสัญญาณ Ethernet และ PoE; โมดูลส่งรับสัญญาณไฟเบอร์ออปติก; ตัวขยายสัญญาณไวไฟ
da: Elektronik > Netværk > Repeatere og transceivere: Ethernet- og PoE-forlængere; Fiberoptiske transceiver-moduler; Wi-Fi-rækkeviddeforlængere